Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-231
Constitutional convention; information; duty of state, county, and political subdivision officer to furnish; penalty.

It shall be the duty of every state, county, and political subdivision officer to promptly transmit any information at his command which either the convention or preliminary survey committee may require of him. If any officer shall fail or refuse to comply with any of the provisions of this section, he shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 20, p. 553;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 306.